tests/a_0.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    App: hfst-optimised-lookup
    Gen: ../chv.autogen.hfst
    Morph: ../chv.automorf.hfst

Tests:

  "For some reason {а} in the present tense suffix doesn't fall in verbs like вула (ending in а)":
    шыра<v><tv><pres><p3><sg> : шырать
    вула<v><tv><pres><p1><sg> : вулатӑп
    ӗҫле<v><iv><pres><p1><sg> : ӗҫлетӗп
    пул<v><iv><pres><p1><sg> : пулатӑп
    ил<v><iv><pres><p1><sg> : илетӗп
